Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB91.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 134 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) All real property tax bills shall be on a standardized form prescribed by the
department. The form shall incorporate blank spaces for inputting the following
information:
(a) The name, address, phone number, website, or other identifying
information of the sheriff or taxing district responsible for collecting the
tax;
(b) The taxpayer's name, mailing address, and account number;
(c) The physical address, parcel number, property description, or other
identifying information of the real property being taxed;
(d) The tax bill number;
(e) The assessed value and taxable value of the real property;
(f) Exemptions applicable to the real property;
(g) The name or description of each taxing district levying a property tax on the
real property;
(h) The tax rate for each taxing district levying a property tax on the real
property expressed in terms of the rate per one hundred dollars ($100) of
assessed value;
(i) The tax year of the assessment;
(j) Fees assessed on the real property;
(k) The due date and the total tax due, including a schedule of payment for
receiving a discount and for assessing penalties and interest;
(l) Delinquencies related to the real property;
(m) Memoranda or notes to the taxpayer;
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 11/17/2025 1:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 459
(n) An explanation of the payment methods available and associated fees; and
(o) Any other information the department deems necessary to be included on
the tax bill.
(2) The form shall include the department's website address in accordance with KRS
133.225(2).
(3) The form may include a detachable stub for submitting payment of the tax.
(4) The department shall make the form available to all taxing districts that levy a
property tax on real property located within this state.
(5) This section does not apply to certificates of delinquency or third-party
purchasers.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 11/17/2025 1:54 PM Jacketed